District of Columbia statutes.
1-204.83

Payment of the general obligation bonds and notes.

(a)

The Council shall provide in each annual budget for the District of Columbia government for a fiscal year adopted by the Council pursuant to § 1-204.46 sufficient funds to pay the principal of and interest on all general obligation bonds or notes issued under § 1-204.61(a), § 1-204.71(a), or § 1-204.72(a) becoming due and payable during such fiscal year.

(b)

The Mayor shall insure that the principal of and interest on all general obligation bonds and notes issued under § 1-204.61(a), § 1-204.71(a), or § 1-204.72(a) are paid when due, including by paying such principal and interest from funds not otherwise legally committed.

(c)

Repealed.

(d)

Section 1-204.46(c) shall not apply to:

(1)

Any amount set aside in a debt service fund under § 1-204.81(a);

(2)

Any amount obligated or expended for the payment of the principal of, interest on, or redemption premium for any general obligation bond or note issued under § 1-204.61(a), § 1-204.71(a), or § 1-204.72(a);

(3)

Any amount obligated or expended as provided by the Council in any annual budget for the District of Columbia government pursuant to subsection (a) of this section or as provided by any amendment or supplement to such budget; or

(4)

Any amount obligated or expended by the Mayor pursuant to subsection (b) or (c) [(c) repealed] of this section.

History

Dec. 24, 1973, 87 Stat. 807, Pub. L. 93-198, title IV, § 483
as added Dec. 23, 1981, 95 Stat. 1498, Pub. L. 97-105, § 14
Aug. 5, 1997, 111 Stat. 777, Pub. L. 105-33, § 11601(b)(1)(B)
July 25, 2013, D.C. Law 19-321, § 2(h), 60 DCR 1724

Section References

This section is referenced in § 1-204.46 and § 1-204.48.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-331.2.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 19-321 substituted “ Section 1-204.46(c)” for “The fourth sentence of § 1-204.46” in the introductory paragraph of (d).

Effective Dates

Section 5 of D.C. Law 19-321 provided that the act shall take effect as provided in § 1-203.03.

Editor's Notes

Applicability of D.C. Law 19-321: Section 3 of D.C. Law 19-321 provided that section 2 of the act shall apply as of January 1, 2014.

D.C. Law 19-321 was declared invalid by the United States District Court for the District of Columbia in a memorandum opinion dated May 19, 2014, Civil Action No. 2014-0655. The court held that although the Council of the District of Columbia, the Mayor, and United States District Court for the District of Columbia are powerless to grant to the residents of the District of Columbia full budget autonomy, the United States Congress and the President of the United States are empowered to do so; and concluded that the Budget Autonomy Act was unlawful. See Council of the Dist. of Columbia v. Gray, 42 F. Supp. 3d 134, 2014 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 68055 (2014).

On May 27, 2015, the United States Court of Appeals for the District of Columbia Circuit issued Order No. 14-7067, vacating the lower court’s judgment, dismissing the appeal, and remanding the case to the District Court with instructions to remand the case to the Superior Court of the District of Columbia. See Council of the Dist. of Columbia v. Bowser, 2015 U.S. App. LEXIS 8881 (2015). The amendments contained in D.C. Law 19-321 are codified in this section.